Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1776
Dividends.

(1) The board of directors may periodically authorize and declare dividends to be paid on share accounts and membership shares, if any, from the credit union's undivided earnings after provisions have been made for the required reserves. Share accounts within the same class and of different classes may be paid dividends at differing rates depending on the amounts in the account or the contractual terms applicable to the account.

(2) Dividends shall not be declared or paid at a time when the credit union is insolvent or when payment thereof would render the credit union insolvent.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 76.